Virginia statutes. Title 5.1. Aviation.
Chapter 10. Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority.
§ 5.1-166.
Credit of Commonwealth and political subdivisions not pledged.

Revenue bonds issued under the provisions of this act shall not constitute a debt of the Commonwealth of Virginia or of any other political subdivision thereof nor a pledge of the faith and credit of the Commonwealth or of any political subdivision thereof. Such bonds shall be payable solely from funds provided therefor from revenues. The issuance of revenue bonds under the provisions of this act shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the Commonwealth or any political subdivision thereof to the payment thereof or to the levy or pledge of any form of taxation whatever therefor. All such revenue bonds shall contain a statement on their face substantially to this effect.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-167.
Trust agreement.

In the discretion of the Authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this act may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the power of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth of Virginia. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the fees and other revenues to be received, but shall not convey or mortgage the airports or any part thereof. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the acquisition of property and the construction, improvement, maintenance, repair, operation and insurance of the airports, the rates or fees or other charges to be charged, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or of revenues to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such trust agreement may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of the operation of the airports.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-168.
Revenues.

The Authority is hereby authorized to fix, revise, charge and collect fees or other charges for the use of the airports and to contract with any person, partnership, association or corporation desiring the use of any part thereof, including the right-of-way adjoining the airports for placing thereon telephone, telegraph, electric light or power lines, and to fix the terms, conditions, rents and fees or other charges for such use. Such fees or other charges shall be so fixed and adjusted in respect of the aggregate of fees or other charges from the airports as to provide a fund sufficient with other revenues, if any, (i) to pay the cost of maintaining, repairing and operating the airports, (ii) to pay the principal of and interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable, and (iii) to create reserves for such purposes. The fees and other charges and all other revenues derived from the airports, except such part thereof as may be necessary to pay such cost of maintenance, repair and operation and provide such reserves as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due, and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The fees and other charges and other revenues or other moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Authority. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of such sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or of such trust agreement. Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution or such trust agreement, such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-169.
Trust funds.

All proceeds from the sale of bonds and revenues derived therefrom received pursuant to the provisions of this act shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this act. The Authority may, in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds, provide for the payment of the proceeds of the sale of the bonds and the revenues of the Authority to a trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the Commonwealth of Virginia, which shall act as trustee of the funds, and hold and apply the same to the purposes of this act, subject to such regulations as this act and such resolution or trust agreement may provide. The trustee may invest and reinvest such funds in such securities as may be provided in the resolution authorizing the bonds or in the trust agreement securing such bonds.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-170.
Annual audit.

The Authority shall keep suitable records of all its financial transactions and shall have the same audited annually. Copies of such audit shall be furnished to the Governor of the Commonwealth of Virginia and to the Mayor of the District of Columbia and shall be open to public inspection.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-171.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this act or of any of the coupons appertaining thereto, and the trustee under any trust agreement, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such trust agreement, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, injunction, mandamus or other proceedings, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia, or granted by this act or under such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this act or by such agreement or resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer or agent thereof including the fixing, charging and collection of fees or other charges.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-172.
Exemption from taxation.

The exercise of the powers granted by this act shall be in all respects for the benefit of the inhabitants of the Commonwealth of Virginia, for the increase of their commerce, and for the promotion of their safety, health, welfare, convenience and prosperity, and as the operation and maintenance of the airports by the Authority will constitute the performance of essential governmental functions, the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes or assessments upon the airports or any property acquired or used by the Authority under the provisions of this act or upon the income therefrom; and the bonds issued under the provisions of this act, their transfer and the income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, shall at all times be free and exempt from taxation by the Commonwealth of Virginia and by any municipality, county or other political subdivision thereof.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-173.
Jurisdiction of courts; liability for contracts and torts.

The courts of the Commonwealth of Virginia shall have original jurisdiction of all actions brought by or against the Authority, which courts shall in all cases apply the law of the Commonwealth of Virginia.

The Authority shall be liable for its contracts and for its torts and those of its members, officers, employees, and agents committed in the conduct of any proprietary function, in accordance with the law of the Commonwealth of Virginia but shall not be liable for any torts occurring in the performance of a governmental function. The exclusive remedy for such breach of contracts and torts for which the Authority shall be liable, as herein provided, shall be by suit against the Authority. Nothing in this act shall be construed as a waiver by the Commonwealth of Virginia or the District of Columbia or of their political subdivisions of any immunity from suit.

The Authority shall be responsible for all executory contracts entered into by the United States with respect to the former Metropolitan Washington Airports before the date of acquisition of those airports, except that the procedure for disputes resolution contained in any such contract shall continue to govern the performance of the contract unless otherwise agreed to by the parties to the contract.

The Authority shall not be responsible for any tort claims arising before the date of transfer.

History.

2001, c. 342.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

2C M.J. Aviation, § 6.

§ 5.1-174.
Procurement Act exemption.

In light of the multijurisdictional nature of the Authority, an exemption is hereby provided to the Authority from the provisions of the Virginia Public Procurement Act.

History.

2001, c. 342.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Public Procurement Act, see §

2.2-4300

et seq.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Procurement procedures. —

State agency can negotiate to include in its grant agreement a provision that makes Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority’s receipt of Virginia funds conditional upon Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority conducting the procurement in a manner that does not give a preference to offerors who will have a project labor agreement. Such a condition would be enforceable in accordance with general contract laws, but it could not be enforced through the special remedial provisions contained in subsection C of §

2.2-4321.2

, because Metropolitan Washington Airports Authority is not subject to that statute. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark D. Sickles, Member, House of Delegates, 12-025, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 29 (7/6/2012).

§ 5.1-175.
Act liberally construed.

This act, being necessary for the welfare of the Commonwealth of Virginia and its inhabitants, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-176.
Repealed by Acts 2015, c. 709, cl. 2.

Editor’s note.

Former §

5.1-176

, pertaining to severability, derived from 2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-177.
Inconsistent laws inapplicable.

All other general or special laws inconsistent with any provision of this act are hereby declared to be inapplicable to the provisions of this act.

History.

2001, c. 342.

§ 5.1-178.
Repealed by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 377, cl. 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Editor’s note.

Former §

5.1-178

, which contained the effective date provision for this chapter was enacted by Acts 2001, c. 342. The section was formerly “not set out” in conformance with Virginia Code Commission policy.